Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202513-3403
Property tax request authority; calculation.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in the Property Tax Growth Limitation Act, for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025, a political subdivision's property tax request for any year shall not exceed its property tax request authority as determined under this section. The preliminary property tax request authority for each political subdivision shall be the amount of property taxes requested and approved by each political subdivision and included on the budget document filed with the auditor in the prior fiscal year pursuant to subsection (2) of section 13-506, less the sum of exceptions utilized in the prior year pursuant to subdivisions (1) to (7) of section 13-3404.

(2) In addition to the preliminary property tax request authority, the political subdivision's property tax request authority may be increased by:

(a) The product of (i) the amount of property taxes levied in the prior year, less the sum of exceptions utilized in the prior year pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2) of section 13-3404, and (ii) the political subdivision's growth percentage; and

(b) The product of (i) the amount of property taxes levied in the prior year, less the sum of exceptions utilized in the prior year pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2) of section 13-3404, and (ii) the greater of zero or the inflation percentage.

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB34, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB647, § 14.